Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1
MANAGEMENT, CONTROL, AND SUPERVISION

26-12-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Veterans Community Living Centers Act".

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 183, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1690, § 84, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 263, § 5, effective August 6.

26-12-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Central fund" means the central fund for veterans community living centers established in section 26-12-108.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the state department of human services.

"Resident" means a person who resides in a veterans center operated pursuant to the provisions of this article.

"State board" means the state board of human services.

"State department" means the state department of human services.

"Veterans center" means any veterans community living center and any program operated by a veterans community living center, including domiciliary services, day care, and any other programs at the center.

"Veterans community living center" means a veterans center that has been designed and constructed so as to qualify for federal funds under the provisions of federal Public Law 88-450, as amended, and that is operated so as to qualify for per diem payments from the United States veterans administration under the provisions of 38 U.S.C. sec. 1741.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 183, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 99:

(5) amended, p. 627, § 32, effective August 4.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-056), ch. 177, p. 784, § 3, effective April 22.

L. 2014:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 263, § 6, effective August 6.

26-12-103. State board duties - rule-making.

The state board shall adopt rules for the management, control, and supervision of the veterans centers operated pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 184, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 264, § 7, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-102 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-104. Eligibility for care.

A person must be considered for admission to a veterans center if he or she meets the eligibility requirements prescribed in state and federal regulations.

After admission, a resident shall be subject to periodic review as to financial status, need for continuing medical institutional care, and other eligibility factors.

A resident may be transferred or discharged for cause in accordance with federal regulations.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 184, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 264, § 8, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-103 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-105. Application for admission - preference.

Any person may apply for admission to a veterans center in the manner prescribed by rules of the state board.

Application for admission is voluntary, and a person admitted to a veterans center has the right to leave the veterans center at any time he or she chooses.

A veterans center shall review all applications for admission with reasonable promptness.

If the number of eligible applicants exceeds the available facilities in a veterans center, the veterans center shall give preference in admission to persons whose needs are greatest under standards established in state and federal regulations.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 184, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 264, § 9, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-104 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-106. Vacancies - additional admissions.

In the event that vacancies occur in a veterans center and there are no applications for admission from persons eligible pursuant to section 26-12-104, the veterans center shall be open for temporary occupancy to any person based on the person's need for medical care and ability to pay for services in accordance with the rules of the state board.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 184, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 264, § 10, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-304 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-107. Standards - management - employees - adult protective services data system check.

Each veterans center shall be operated and maintained under standards established by the department of public health and environment.

Each veterans center must have:

A nursing home administrator; and

Such additional employees, including medical and nursing personnel, as may be required to provide services for which the veterans center was licensed.

All veterans centers must be managed as a group by the state department, unless the state department contracts for the management of a veterans center in accordance with section 26-12-119.

On and after January 1, 2019, prior to employment, a veterans center shall submit the name of a person who will be providing direct care, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (3.5), to an at-risk adult, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (1.5), as well as any other required identifying information, to the state department for a check of the Colorado adult protective services data system pursuant to section 26-3.1-111, to determine if the person is substantiated in a case of mistreatment of an at-risk adult.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 185, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 265, § 11, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(4) added, (HB 17-1284), ch. 272, p. 1505, § 13, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-105 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-108. Payments for care - funds - report - collections for charges - central fund for veterans centers created - repeal.

The state department shall establish rates for the care of residents, which rates must be as nearly equal to the cost of operation and maintenance of the veterans centers as practicable. Payments shall be made to the state department unless otherwise provided pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with section 26-12-119. The state department shall deposit such payments together with any other moneys received from any source for the operation and maintenance of the veterans centers with the state treasurer, who shall credit all such moneys to the central fund for veterans community living centers, referred to in this article as the "central fund", which fund is hereby created.

Repealed.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate from the general fund to the central fund an amount not exceeding ten percent of the total gross revenue accrued by the central fund during the preceding fiscal year in coordination with the state department's standard budget request process. The state department shall use these funds to pay operational expenses of, and make capital improvements to, the veterans centers.

Repealed.

The money in the central fund is continuously appropriated to the state department for the direct costs of the operation and administration of the veterans centers and for capital construction in connection with the veterans centers; and

Subject to annual appropriation, the state department may expend money from the central fund for indirect costs of the operation and administration of the veterans centers; except that the amount expended for indirect costs shall not exceed five percent of the total expenditures from the fund for the fiscal year.

All requests for capital construction submitted by the state department shall be considered by the capital development committee pursuant to section 2-3-1304, C.R.S.

All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the central fund shall be credited to such fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the central fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

(I.5) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, and for each fiscal year thereafter:

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the state department shall prepare and submit to the general assembly an annual report detailing the financial status of each veterans center. This report must also identify which of the veterans centers administered pursuant to the provisions of this article are owned by the state but operated under contract by another entity.

As part of the budget request that the state department submits to the joint budget committee in accordance with section 2-3-208 (2)(a), C.R.S., the state department shall provide a detailed report of the anticipated direct and indirect costs for the operation and administration of each veterans center for the upcoming fiscal year, including amounts for personal services, operating expenses, indirect costs, centrally appropriated costs, and FTE.

It is lawful for each veterans center and the Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake to deposit moneys belonging to the benefit fund established prior to July 1, 1985, and all donations or other voluntary contributions that may be received on or after that date in any manner for the benefit of residents of each veterans center and the Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake in an interest-bearing account with a federally insured financial depository pursuant to section 24-75-603, C.R.S. Withdrawals from such accounts shall be made only for the benefit, aid, and assistance of residents of each veterans center or the occupants of the Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake, including recreational equipment and facilities.

The executive director may, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado and through the attorney general, institute and maintain actions at law for the collection of charges due from residents of veterans centers and the Colorado veterans community living center at Homelake, or said residents' conservators, guardians, executors, or administrators, resulting from the failure, neglect, or refusal of said persons to pay such charges.

If the state department sells a portion of vacant land to the United States department of veterans affairs for expansion of the Fort Logan national cemetery as authorized in House Bill 16-1456, enacted in 2016, the state treasurer shall credit the sale proceeds of such sale to the Fort Logan national cemetery fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this subsection (4) as the "cemetery fund". In the fiscal year in which the property sale takes place, and in each fiscal year thereafter until all sale proceeds are appropriated as specified in this paragraph (a), the general assembly shall appropriate money from the cemetery fund to the central fund in such amounts so that the appropriation from the cemetery fund required in this subsection (4) and the appropriation from the general fund required in paragraph (a.5) of subsection (1) of this section equals the maximum amount that would not exceed the limit for an enterprise set forth in section 24-77-102 (3)(b), C.R.S.

The moneys transferred to the central fund pursuant to this subsection (4) may be used for nonrecurring expenditures that address the greatest needs of serving veterans.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), at least sixty days prior to making such expenditures, the state department shall report its recommended use of the sale proceeds to the state, veterans, and military affairs committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the capital development committee, and the joint budget committee.

All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the cemetery fund are credited to the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the cemetery fund remain in the fund and may not be credited or transferred to the general fund. The state controller shall notify the revisor of statutes when all the proceeds of the sale are appropriated to the central fund pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

The cemetery fund is repealed, effective on the date the revisor of statutes receives the notice from the state controller set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c).

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 185, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2007:

(1)(a.5) added, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1063), ch. 149, p. 536, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 265, § 12, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(4) added, (HB 16-1456), ch. 197, p. 696, § 3, effective June 1; (1)(b)(I) amended and (1)(b)(I.5) and (1)(d) added, (SB 16-195), ch. 215, p. 828, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) and (4)(b) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 523, § 15, effective August 9.

26-12-109. County chargeability.

For the purposes of this part 1, a resident in a veterans center must be a charge for public assistance purposes to the county in which the veterans center is located.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 186, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 266, § 13, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-107 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-110. Declaration of policy - enterprise status.

A veterans center or group of veterans centers is an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as:

The state department retains authority to issue anticipation warrants on behalf of the veterans center or group of veterans centers; and

The veterans center or group of veterans centers receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants from the state and all Colorado local governments combined.

So long as it constitutes an enterprise, a veterans center or group of veterans centers shall not be subject to any of the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 186, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 267, § 14, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-109 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-111. Proposed veterans community living centers - criteria.

The state department, in consultation with the Colorado board of veterans affairs, is responsible for recommending any proposed sites for veterans centers to be constructed, leased, or purchased on or after July 1, 1998, to the capital development committee and the joint budget committee. The general assembly is responsible for the selection of any proposed site for such veterans centers.

When evaluating a potential site for a proposed veterans center, the following criteria must be considered:

The proximity of the proposed veterans center to veterans affairs medical services;

The impact the proposed veterans center would have upon the financial viability of existing veterans centers; and

Whether there is an established bed need for the proposed veterans center based upon the location of Colorado veterans, their families, and support systems.

A veterans center constructed, leased, or purchased on or after July 1, 1998, must have a bed capacity of at least one hundred twenty beds.

A veterans center must not be constructed on or after July 1, 1998, unless other veterans centers have maintained an average occupancy rate of at least eighty percent over the six-month period immediately prior to the commencement of the construction of the new veterans center.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 186, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 267, § 15, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-109.5 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-112. Powers and duties of state department.

The state department may, in addition to the powers granted in this article, whenever authorized and locations have been designated by the general assembly:

Establish, construct, operate, maintain, and improve, within the state of Colorado, buildings and facilities, and the means necessary thereto, for the full exercise of the powers granted by this article;

Identify the records that the administrator of each veterans center shall submit to the state department;

Set aside a special sinking fund account in the central fund for the payment of anticipation warrants authorized by and issued under the provisions of section 26-12-113 and for the payment of interest due on such warrants; except that the state department shall not pledge the general income of the state of Colorado or appropriations made by the general assembly for any veterans center, nor shall it create a mortgage upon the property belonging to any such veterans center, for the payment of the principal of the warrants and interest thereon. The state department shall deposit into the sinking fund account fees and revenues received from residents at veterans centers sufficient to cover necessary reserve accounts and principal and interest payments, which fees and revenues shall first be applied upon the payment of principal and such anticipation warrants and interest thereon. Any moneys in the sinking fund account not necessary for the reserve nor for the payment of principal and interest may be made available for the maintenance and operation of veterans centers.

Accept any grants from, or payments made by, the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof and receive gifts, legacies, devises, and conveyances of property, real or personal, that may be made, given, transferred pursuant to a purchase and sale, or granted to the state department for veterans centers. The state department, with the approval of the governor, shall make disposition of such property in the best interest of the veterans centers under the control and supervision of the state department.

All titles to real property and all improvements thereon shall be vested in the state, and the title deeds thereto and all insurance policies, certificates of water rights, and other evidences of ownership to the real property or improvements of a veterans center shall be deposited with the state department.

No payment shall be made out of the state treasury or otherwise for any real property described in this section until the title has been examined and approved by the attorney general. Every such deed of conveyance shall be immediately recorded in the office of the proper county clerk and recorder and thereafter deposited with the state department.

The state department, by October 31, 2002, and on or before October 31 each year thereafter, shall provide sufficient information to enable the Colorado board of veterans affairs to complete the report required by section 28-5-703 (3), C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 187, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2002:

(4) added, p. 360, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5) added, (SB 09-056), ch. 177, p. 784, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2011:

(5) repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1170, § 75, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 268, § 16, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-110 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-113. Anticipation warrants - legislative declaration.

For the purpose of defraying the cost of construction of new facilities, reconstruction or improvement of existing facilities, and maintenance and operation of such facilities, the state department may, with the approval of the governor, issue anticipation warrants that shall be payable solely from the sinking fund account described in section 26-12-112, and the payments and interest on such anticipation warrants shall be a first charge on and shall be payable from said account.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the authority to issue anticipation warrants as set forth in this section shall constitute authority to issue revenue bonds for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Any other provision of this article notwithstanding, the state department may not issue any anticipation warrants or otherwise borrow funds for the construction of additional veterans centers, unless the construction of additional veterans centers is specifically authorized by law.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 188, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 268, § 17, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-111 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-114. Interest - term.

All anticipation warrants issued under the provisions of sections 26-12-110 to 26-12-118 shall bear interest at a rate determined by the state department and shall be executed in such a manner, shall be paid serially in such annual installments, beginning not later than two years and extending not more than twenty-five years from the date thereof, and shall be executed and paid at such place or places as the executive director shall determine.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 188, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-112 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-115. Signatures validated.

If any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the anticipation warrants issued under the provisions of this article or coupons attached thereto cease to be such officers before delivery of such warrants, such signatures and countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes with the same force and effect as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 189, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-113 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-116. Obligations limited.

Nothing in sections 26-12-110 to 26-12-118 shall be construed as to authorize the state department to incur any obligation of any kind or nature except such as shall be payable solely from moneys accruing to the special sinking fund account created pursuant to section 26-12-112.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each anticipation warrant that it has been issued under the provisions of sections 26-12-110 to 26-12-118 and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the general fund of the state within the meaning of any constitutional provision or limitation.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 189, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-114 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-117. Anticipation warrants legal investments.

It is lawful for the state of Colorado, any of its departments, institutions, or agencies, or any political subdivision of the state to purchase anticipation warrants issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 26-12-110 to 26-12-118 if such warrants satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.; except that the state, its departments, institutions, or agencies, or any of its political subdivisions shall not invest more than twenty percent of the total of any specific fund of such entities in such warrants.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 189, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-115 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-118. Order of payment of warrants.

The anticipation warrants issued under this part 1 shall be serially numbered and shall be paid off and retired in the order in which they were issued.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 189, § 1, effective April 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-116 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-119. Contractual agreements.

The state department is authorized to contract with any public or private entity for all or part of the operation or management of any veterans center in accordance with the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S., and with part 5 of article 50 of title 24, C.R.S.

Any contract authorized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall specify the entity's reporting relationship to the state and delineate responsibility for rate calculation, financial performance, liability, and compliance with section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 189, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 269, § 18, effective August 6.

26-12-120. Intestate estate - escheat.

If a resident dies without legal heirs and without a will disposing of his or her estate, all of the property, real and personal, shall pass to the state of Colorado for the sole use and benefit of the veterans center in which the resident lived at the time of his or her death, subject to the provisions of section 25.5-4-302, C.R.S., and subsection (2) of this section.

The personal property and effects of deceased residents shall be taken into possession by the administrator of the veterans center in which the resident lived at the time of his or her death and held in accordance with the rules of the state board.

The rules of the state board must provide for a sufficient period of time, not to exceed one year, in which the heirs of a deceased resident may make claim to the deceased resident's property and effects. If a claim is not made to the property, the property may be sold, and the proceeds of the sale shall be placed in the benefit fund created by section 26-12-108 (2) for the personal use and benefit of other residents of the veterans center in which the resident lived at the time of his or her death, subject to claims as a result of appropriate judicial proceedings.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article R&RE, p. 190, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 2019, § 106, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 269, § 19, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-12-308 as it existed prior to 1998.

26-12-121. Veterans community living centers - local advisory boards - rules.

The state board, with input from the office within the state department responsible for the oversight of veterans community living centers, shall promulgate rules to establish the requirements and procedures governing the creation and operation of local advisory boards at each of the existing veterans centers within the state department, located in Homelake, Florence, Rifle, Aurora, and Walsenburg, Colorado.

Each local advisory board shall consist of at least five members. At least one of the members shall be a resident of the veterans center or a person who, at the time of his or her appointment, is a family member of a resident of the veterans center.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 280, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-056), ch. 177, p. 785, § 6, effective April 22.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1171, § 76, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 269, § 20, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(3) repealed, (SB 17-219), ch. 348, p. 1831, § 1, effective June 5.